Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.1:5.
Pilot program for underground transmission lines.

There is hereby established a pilot program to further the understanding of underground electric transmission lines in regard to electric reliability, construction methods and related cost and timeline estimating, the probability of meeting such projections,
and the benefits of undergrounding existing electric transmission lines to promote economic development within the Commonwealth. The pilot program shall consist of the approval to construct qualifying electrical transmission lines
of 230 kilovolts or less (but greater than 69 kilovolts) in whole or in part underground. Such pilot program shall consist of a total of two qualifying electrical transmission line projects, constructed in whole or in part underground,
as specified and set forth in this section.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, as a part of the pilot program established pursuant to this section, the Commission shall approve as a qualifying project a transmission line of 230 kilovolts or less that is pending final approval of a certificate
of public convenience and necessity from the Commission as of December 31, 2017, for the construction of an electrical transmission line approximately 5.3 miles in length utilizing both overhead and underground transmission facilities,
of which the underground portion shall be approximately 3.1 miles in length, which has been previously proposed for construction within or immediately adjacent to the right-of-way of an interstate highway. Once the Commission has
affirmed the project need through an order, the project shall be constructed in part underground, and the underground portion shall consist of a double circuit.The Commission shall approve such underground construction within 30
days of receipt of the written request of the public utility to participate in the pilot program pursuant to this section. The Commission shall not require the submission of additional technical and cost analyses as a condition
of its approval but may request such analyses for its review. The Commission shall approve the underground construction of one contiguous segment of the transmission line that is approximately 3.1 miles in length that was previously
proposed for construction within or immediately adjacent to the right-of-way of the interstate highway, for which, by resolution, the locality has indicated general community support. The remainder of the construction for the transmission
line shall be aboveground. The Commission shall not be required to perform any further analysis as to the impacts of this route, including environmental impacts or impacts upon historical resources.The electric utility may proceed
to acquire right-of-way and take such other actions as it deems appropriate in furtherance of the construction of the approved transmission line, including acquiring the cables necessary for the underground installation.

In reviewing applications submitted by public utilities for certificates of public convenience and necessity for the construction of electrical transmission lines of 230 kilovolts or less filed between July 1, 2018, and October 1, 2020, the Commission
shall approve, consistent with the requirements of subsection D, one additional application as a qualifying project to be constructed in whole or in part underground, as a part of this pilot program. The one qualifying project
shall be in addition to the qualifying project described in subsection B and shall be the relocation or conversion of an existing 230-kilovolt overhead line to an underground line.

For purposes of subsection C, a project shall be qualified to be placed underground, in whole or in part, if it meets all of the following criteria: (i) an engineering analysis demonstrates that it is technically feasible to place the proposed line, in
whole or in part, underground; (ii) the governing body of each locality in which a portion of the proposed line will be placed underground indicates, by resolution, general community support for the project and that it supports
the transmission line to be placed underground; (iii) a project has been filed with the Commission or is pending issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity by October 1, 2020; (iv) the estimated additional cost
of placing the proposed line, in whole or in part, underground does not exceed $40 million or, if greater than $40 million, the cost does not exceed 2.5 times the cost of placing the same line overhead, assuming accepted industry
standards for undergrounding to ensure safety and reliability; if the public utility, the affected localities, and the Commission agree, a proposed underground line whose cost exceeds 2.5 times the cost of placing the line overhead
may also be accepted into the pilot program; (v) the public utility requests that the project be considered as a qualifying project under this section; and (vi) the primary need of the project shall be for purposes of grid reliability,
grid resiliency, or to support economic development priorities of the Commonwealth, including the economic development priorities and the comprehensive plan of the governing body of the locality in which at least a portion of line
will be placed, and shall not be to address aging assets that would have otherwise been replaced in due course.

A transmission line project that is found to meet the criteria of subsection D shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of subsection B of § 56-46.1 with respect to a finding of the Commission that the line is needed.

Approval of a transmission line pursuant to this section for inclusion in the pilot program shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of §

15.2-2232

and local zoning ordinances with respect to such transmission line and any associated facilities, such as stations, substations, transition stations and locations, and switchyards or stations, that may be required.

The Commission shall report annually to the Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring, the Joint Commission on Technology and Science, and the Governor on the progress of the pilot program by no later than December 1 of each year that this section
is in effect. The Commission shall submit a final report to the Commission on Electric Utility Restructuring, the Joint Commission on Technology and Science, and the Governor no later than December 1, 2024, analyzing the entire
program and making recommendations about the continued placement of transmission lines underground in the Commonwealth. The Commission’s final report shall include analysis and findings of the costs of underground construction
and historical and future consumer rate effects of such costs, effect of underground transmission lines on grid reliability, operability (including operating voltage), probability of meeting cost and construction timeline estimates
of such underground transmission lines, and economic development, aesthetic or other benefits attendant to the placement of transmission lines underground.

For the qualifying projects chosen pursuant to this section and not fully recoverable as charges for new transmission facilities pursuant to subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1, the Commission shall approve a rate adjustment clause. The rate adjustment clause
shall provide for the full and timely recovery of any portion of the cost of such project not recoverable under applicable rates, terms, and conditions approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and shall include the
use of the fair return on common equity most recently approved in a State Corporation Commission proceeding for such utility. Such costs shall be entirely assigned to the utility’s Virginia jurisdictional customers. The Commission’s
final order regarding any petition filed pursuant to this subsection shall be entered not more than three months after the filing of such petition.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the ability of the Commission to approve additional applications for placement of transmission lines underground. Approval by the Commission of a transmission line for inclusion in the program
pursuant to subsection B shall preclude the placement of future overhead electrical transmission lines of at least 69 kilovolts in the same right-of-way as described in subsection B for a period of 10 years from July 1, 2018, but
shall not preclude the placement of (i) any underground transmission lines in such right-of-way or (ii) any electrical distribution lines in such right-of-way.

If two applications are not submitted to the Commission that meet the requirements of this section, the Commission shall document the failure of the projects to qualify for the pilot program in order to justify approving fewer than two projects to be
placed underground, in whole or in part.

Insofar as the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or local ordinance, the provisions of this section shall be controlling.

History.
2018, c. 296; 2020, cc. 164, 165, 797.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 2 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 164 and 165 are identical, and in the first sentence in subsection A, added “and the benefits of undergrounding existing electric transmission lines to promote economic development within the Commonwealth”; in subsection B,
in the first sentence of the second paragraph, substituted “section” for “subsection”; in subsection C, substituted “October 1, 2020” for “July 1, 2020” and added “and shall be the relocation or conversion of an existing 230-kilovolt
overhead line to an underground line”; in subsection D, in clause (iii), substituted “October 1, 2020” for “July 1, 2020”, in clause (iv) inserted “$40 million or, if greater than $40 million, the cost does not exceed” and in clause
(vi) inserted “including the economic development priorities and the comprehensive plan of the governing body of the locality in which at least a portion of line will be placed”; inserted subsection E and redesignated the remaining
subsections accordingly; and in the last sentence in subsection G, deleted “but not be limited to” preceding “analysis and findings” and inserted “economic development.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 797 added the second sentence in subsection H [now subsection I].

§ 56-585.1:6.
Pilot Programs to deploy electric power storage batteries.

The Commission shall establish pilot programs under which each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1, shall submit a proposal to deploy electric power storage batteries. A proposal shall
provide for the deployment of batteries pursuant to a pilot program that accomplishes at least one of the following: (i) improve reliability of electrical transmission or distribution systems; (ii) improve integration of different
types of renewable resources; (iii) deferred investment in generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity; (iv) reduced need for additional generation of electricity during times of peak demand; or (v) connection to the
facilities of a customer receiving generation, transmission, and distribution service from the utility. A Phase I Utility may install batteries with up to 10 megawatts of capacity. A Phase II Utility may install batteries with
up to 30 megawatts of capacity. Each pilot program shall have a duration of five years. The pilot program shall provide for the recovery of all reasonable and prudent costs incurred under the pilot program through the electric
utility’s base rates on a nondiscriminatory basis. Any pilot program proposed by a Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility that satisfies the requirements of this subsection is in the public interest.

The Commission shall, by December 1, 2018, adopt such rules or establish such guidelines as may be necessary for the general administration of pilot programs to deploy electric power storage batteries established by subsection A.

History.
2018, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cls. 9 and 10 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

§ 56-585.1:7.
Pilot program for electric generation by public schools.

The Commission shall require a Phase II Utility as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 to submit a proposal to the Commission to conduct a pilot program, not to exceed 10 megawatts in the aggregate, in its certificated service territory to allow
any school in a public school division in the Commonwealth that generates electricity from a wind-powered or solar-powered renewable energy generation facility located at the school in amounts that exceed the amount of electricity
consumed by the school in a billing period, at the option of the school board, to either (i) credit such excess electricity to the metered accounts of one or more other schools in the same public school division, as directed by
the school board, in a manner that reduces the amount of electricity for which the other school or schools are billed and provides the other school or schools with a credit against the amount billed to the other school or schools,
which credit shall be at the same rate that the school or schools would otherwise be charged for such amount of electricity, without the assessment by the supplier of any service charges or fees in connection with or arising out
of such crediting or (ii) receive payment for such excess electricity from the electric utility at the contractually negotiated rate. The duration of any pilot program approved by the Commission pursuant to this section shall be
six years.

The Commission shall, by December 1, 2018, adopt such rules or establish such guidelines as may be necessary for its general administration of the pilot program established under this section.

Any electric utility participating in the pilot program established under this section shall report to the General Assembly by December 1 of each year the pilot program is in effect, commencing in 2020, regarding the status of the pilot program’s enrollment
and any other information that may be appropriate.

History.
2018, c. 415.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 415 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 56-585.1:8.
Pilot program for municipal net energy metering.

As used in this section: “Host account” means the premises on which a municipal customer-generator’s electrical generating facility is located. “Municipal customer-generator” means a municipality that owns or operates, or that contracts with other persons
to own or operate, an electrical generating facility that (i) uses as its total source of fuel renewable energy as defined in § 56-576, (ii) has a generating capacity of not more than three megawatts, (iii) is located on land owned
or leased by the municipality within the municipality and is connected to the municipality’s wiring on the municipality’s side of its interconnection with the utility, (iv) is interconnected and operated in parallel with the utility’s
transmission and distribution facilities, and (v) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the municipal customer-generator’s own electricity requirements. The capacity of any generating facility installed under this section,
other than a generating facility located on airports, landfills, parking lots and garages, wastewater treatment sites, parks, post-mine land, or a reservoir that is owned, operated, or leased by the municipality, shall not exceed
the same limitation established with respect to an eligible customer-generator as set forth in the definition of such term in subsection B of § 56-594. “Municipality” means any county, city, or town in the Commonwealth, other than
a municipality that owns and operates its own electric utility, or any authority created pursuant to the Park Authorities Act (§

15.2-5700

et seq.). “Net energy metering” means measuring the difference, over the net metering period, between (i) electricity supplied to a municipal customer-generator from the electric grid and (ii) the electricity generated
and fed back to the electric grid by the municipal customer-generator. “Net metering period” means the 12-month period following the date of final interconnection of the municipal customer-generator’s system with its utility and
each 12-month period thereafter. “Phase I Utility” and “Phase II Utility” have the same meaning as defined in § 56-585.1:3. “Utility” means a Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility.

The Commission shall require each Phase I Utility to submit a proposal to the Commission to conduct a pilot program for municipal net energy metering in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

A pilot program shall be conducted within the service territory of each Phase I Utility. The pilot program shall allow any municipal customer-generator that generates electricity from a renewable energy generation facility in amounts that exceed the amount
of the utility’s electricity consumed by the host municipal customer-generator account to credit one or more of the municipality’s target metered accounts or metered accounts of the public school division of the municipality.
In each Phase I Utility’s pilot program, the target accounts may be at one or more other separately utility-metered public buildings or facilities at contiguous or noncontiguous sites owned by the municipality and used
for a public purpose. In each Phase I Utility’s pilot program, excess electricity beyond that used by the host account shall be credited to the metered account of the target municipal customer in the same municipality,
such that the generation energy charges on the electric bills of such target’s metered accounts shall be reduced by the amount of the excess generation kilowatt-hours apportioned to the metered accounts multiplied by the
applicable generation energy rate of the target’s accounts. The generation energy rate of the target’s accounts includes all applicable kilowatt-hour-based rate adjustment clauses with the exception of any non-fuel-related
or non-generation-related kilowatt-hour-based rate adjustment clauses. The netting of the amount of electricity generated and the amount of electricity consumed, and the crediting for the amount of any excess generation
determined as a result of such netting, shall occur in the twelfth month following the commencement of the host municipal customer-generator’s generation of electricity under a pilot program and annually thereafter, regardless
of the municipal customer-generator’s regular billing period.

The pilot program shall not limit the current authority of any municipality to participate in any other net energy metering program.

The amount of generating capacity of the generating facilities that are the subject of a pilot program under this subsection shall not exceed five megawatts, although the Phase I Utility may, in its discretion, increase the generating capacity that is
part of the program up to 10 megawatts.

The aggregated capacity of all generation facilities that are the subject of each Phase I Utility’s pilot program under this subsection shall constitute a portion of the existing limit of the utility’s adjusted Virginia peak-load forecast of the previous
year that is available to (i) municipal customer-generators under this section, (ii) eligible customer-generators and eligible agricultural customer-generators under § 56-594, and (iii) small agricultural generators under
§ 56-594.2 in the utility’s service area. Municipal customer-generators shall be eligible to participate in a Phase I Utility’s pilot program implemented under this subsection on a first-come, first-served basis in each
utility’s Virginia service area until the limits set forth in subdivision 3 are met.

The Commission shall require each Phase II Utility to submit a proposal to the Commission to conduct a pilot program for municipal net energy metering in accordance with the following terms, conditions, and restrictions:

A pilot program shall be conducted within the service territory of each Phase II Utility. The pilot program shall allow any municipal customer-generator that generates electricity from a renewable energy generation facility in amounts that exceed the
amount of the utility’s electricity consumed by the municipal customer-generator host account to credit one or more of the municipality’s target metered accounts (target accounts or beneficial accounts). In each Phase II
Utility’s pilot program, the target accounts may be at one or more other separately utility-metered public buildings or facilities at contiguous or noncontiguous sites owned or leased by the municipality within the municipality.
In each Phase II Utility’s pilot program, excess electricity beyond that used by the host account shall be credited to the beneficial accounts selected by the municipal customer in the same municipality. The generation
energy charges on the electric bills of such beneficial accounts shall be reduced by the amount of the excess electricity kilowatt-hours apportioned to the net metered accounts multiplied by the applicable generation rate
of the selected beneficial accounts. The generation energy rate of each selected beneficial account shall include all applicable rate adjustment clauses and riders, including fuel riders, with the exception of any non-fuel-related
or non-generation-related riders. Non-bypassable charges shall be excluded from reductions on beneficial accounts. The netting of the amount of electricity generated and the amount of electricity consumed, and the crediting
for the amount of any excess electricity determined as a result of such netting, shall occur in the twelfth month following the commencement of the host municipal customer-generator’s generation of electricity under a pilot
program and annually thereafter, regardless of the municipal customer-generator’s regular billing period.

The pilot program shall not limit the current authority of any municipality to participate in any other net energy metering program.

The amount of generating capacity of the generating facilities that are the subject of a pilot program under this subsection shall not exceed 25 megawatts.

Municipal customer-generators shall be eligible to participate in a Phase II Utility’s pilot program implemented under this subsection on a first-come, first-served basis in each utility’s Virginia service area until the limits set forth in subdivision
3 are met.

Any pilot program conducted under this section shall require that:

If conducted by a Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility, each participating municipality shall be responsible for all demonstrated administrative costs associated with implementing the pilot program, including demonstrated administrative costs associated
with crediting excess electricity to target accounts; and

If conducted by a Phase I Utility, the credit for excess electricity, to the extent possible, shall be prioritized to be directed to accounts at buildings or facilities of the public school division of the municipality before the credit is directed to
any of the municipality’s target accounts.

Any pilot program conducted pursuant to this section shall not limit the current authority of any municipality to participate in any other net energy metering program.

Neither jurisdictional customers nor non-jurisdictional customers, including those that are members of a joint powers association representing member units of a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, that do not participate in a pilot program under
this section shall bear any costs associated with participation in such pilot program by a participating host municipal customer-generator and participating target municipal customer.

The duration of any pilot program approved by the Commission pursuant to subsection B shall be six years. The duration of any pilot program approved by the Commission pursuant to subsection C shall be until July 1, 2028. If a pilot program is not extended
beyond such initial term, host and target accounts participating at the end of the initial term shall be permitted to continue to participate under the terms of the pilot program that existed during the initial term. The terms
of the pilot program shall be included in future contracts for each municipality that elects to continue its program.

The Commission shall review the pilot program established pursuant to subsection B in 2021 and every two years thereafter for the duration of the pilot program. The Commission shall review the pilot program established pursuant to subsection C in 2024
and every two years thereafter for the duration of the pilot program.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 56-594.02, the aggregated capacity of all generation facilities that are the subject of a utility’s pilot program pursuant to this section shall not constitute any portion of the existing aggregate net metering cap
established in § 56-594 and evaluated by the Commission as part of a net energy metering proceeding.

The aggregated capacity of all generation facilities that are the subject of each utility’s pilot program under this section and that are the subject of a third-party power purchase agreement shall constitute a portion of the existing limit of pilot programs
pursuant to the provisions of § 56-594.02.

History.
2019, cc. 746, 747; 2022, c. 388.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 746 and 747, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall, by December 1, 2019, adopt such rules or establish such guidelines as may be necessary for its general administration of the pilot program established under this
act.”

Acts 2019, cc. 746 and 747, cl. 3 provides: “That any electric utility participating in the pilot program established under this act shall report to the General Assembly by December 1 of each year the pilot program is in effect, commencing in 2020, regarding
the status of the pilot program’s enrollment and any other information that may be appropriate.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 388 rewrote this section, which pertains to a pilot program for municipal net energy metering.

§ 56-585.1:9.
Provision of broadband capacity to unserved areas of the Commonwealth.

Each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1, may submit one or more petitions to provide or make available broadband capacity to Internet service providers in areas of the Commonwealth unserved
by broadband. The provision of such broadband capacity to Internet service providers in areas of the Commonwealth unserved by broadband pursuant to this section is in the public interest.

The costs of providing broadband capacity pursuant to any such petition, net of revenue generated therefrom, shall be eligible for recovery from customers as an electric grid transformation project pursuant to clause (vi) of subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1
filed on or after July 1, 2021, as a non-bypassable charge. Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision A 6 or 7 of § 56-585.1, the utility may file one or more petitions for approval of such a rate adjustment clause, on a stand-alone
basis, seeking recovery of the costs of providing broadband capacity at any time on or after July 1, 2021, and the Commission shall issue its final order regarding such petition within six months following the date of filing.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

13.1-620

or the articles of incorporation of an investor-owned utility, an investor-owned utility may, either directly or through an affiliate or subsidiary, pursuant to a petition that the Commissioner approves pursuant
to this section, (i) own, manage, or control any broadband capacity equipment and electronics, including any plant, works, system, lines, facilities, or properties, or any part or parts thereof, together with all appurtenances
thereto, used or useful in connection with the provision and extension of such broadband services; (ii) lease indefeasible rights of use in such broadband capacity equipment and electronics to Internet service providers in areas
of the Commonwealth unserved by broadband pursuant to this section; and (iii) provide access points that are outside the utility’s energized zone to allow connection between the utility’s broadband capacity system and the Internet
service provider’s system.

Each petition to provide broadband capacity pursuant to this section that an investor-owned utility submits to the Commission shall identify the Internet service provider to which the utility shall lease such capacity, together with the area to be served
using such capacity. The Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, initiate proceedings to review each petition submitted. The Commission shall condition any approval of such petition on the requirement that construction
shall commence within 18 months of such approval. If the utility fails to commence construction within such time period, the utility may resubmit the petition for conditional approval. The Commission shall also condition any approval
of such petition on the requirement that the utility and its Internet service provider submit annual public reports on construction progress by the utility and delivery of broadband services by the Internet service provider until
construction is completed. The Commission’s final order regarding any such petition shall be entered by the Commission no more than six months after the date of filing of such petition. An area shall be determined to be unserved
by broadband if (i) the Department of Housing and Community Development has certified within the last 18 months that the designated area is unserved; (ii) the Virginia Telecommunication Initiative of the Department of Housing and
Community Development has issued a grant or loan to construct a broadband service project within the last 18 months, and the grant or loan recipient is the Internet service provider to which the utility proposes to lease capacity;
(iii) the federal government has issued a grant or loan or has provided support to construct a broadband service project in the designated area within the last 18 months, and the grant or loan recipient is the Internet service
provider to which the utility proposes to lease capacity; or (iv) the Commission determines the area is unserved on the basis of other competent evidence. The determination of the Department of Housing and Community Development
that an area is unserved shall be made following public notice of the proposed finding and an opportunity for third parties to challenge such finding, and such determination shall be presumed sufficient for the Commission to find
the area to be unserved. The Commission may determine that an area is unserved on the basis of other competent evidence.

An investor-owned utility shall be responsible for obtaining all necessary rights-of-way or other easements or real property rights to permit leasing of broadband capacity to Internet service providers. An Internet service provider shall be responsible
for obtaining all necessary rights-of-way or other easements or real property rights from utility access point to permit the provision of broadband services to end-user customers.

As used in this section:“Broadband” means Internet access at speeds equal to or greater than the adequate speed as determined by the broadband guidelines set out by the Department of Housing and Community Development for its Virginia Telecommunication
Initiative from time to time.“Unserved by broadband” means a designated area in which less than 10 percent of residential and commercial units are capable of receiving broadband service, provided that the Department of Housing
and Community Development for its Virginia Telecommunication Initiative may by guideline increase such percentage from time to time.

No investor-owned utility nor any affiliate thereof may offer broadband or Internet service provider services to residential or commercial end-user customers in the Commonwealth pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent
an investor-owned utility or an affiliate thereof from providing transport of or capacity for broadband or Internet service in the Commonwealth as a wholesaler or intermediate vendor, provided that an unaffiliated third party is
the provider of broadband or Internet services to the end-user customer.

The provision and extension of broadband capacity by an incumbent electric utility to an area of the Commonwealth unserved by broadband pursuant to a petition that the Commission approves pursuant to this section, including any business activity related
to the construction or leasing of broadband capacity facilities, shall be exempt from any rules and regulations that the Commission has promulgated or may promulgate governing functional separation of generation, retail transmission,
and distribution of incumbent electric utilities. Investor-owned electric utilities may for the purposes of this section engage in such coordination between and among their various corporate divisions as necessary for the purposes
of providing broadband capacity to an area of the Commonwealth unserved by broadband.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

13.1-620

or the articles of incorporation of an investor-owned utility, an investor-owned utility may, either directly or through an affiliate or subsidiary, lease broadband-related assets or capacity to any third party.
The revenues generated from such leases shall offset (i) the costs of the petition recovered through the rate adjustment clause described in subsection B or (ii) the utility’s electric cost of service.

History.
2019, c. 619; 2020, c. 752; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 356, 357, 369, 370.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in Acts 2019, c. 619, having been 56-585.1:8.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 369 and 370, cl. 2 provides: “That any pilot program established by Phase I or Phase II Utility prior to July 1, 2021, under § 56-585.1:9 of the Code of Virginia prior to the enactment of this act may continue, and the utility
may maintain such pilot program at its discretion, under the terms originally established. Upon the expiration of such pilot program, the utility may seek to renew or extend such program pursuant to the terms of this act.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 752 added subsection J.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 356 and 357, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “nongovernmental” preceding “Internet” throughout subsections A and C-E; substituted “for obtaining” for “to obtain” twice in subsection E; deleted
“nongovernmental” preceding “third party” in subsection G; deleted “that is a wholesaler and that is not a government-owned broadband authority” following “third party” in subsection J; and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 369 and 370, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.